New Jersey, session 221, S1464.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.1988, c.119 (C.39:6A-4.6) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a. The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance shall, within 90 days after the effective date of P.L.1990, c.8 (C.17:33B-1 et al.), promulgate medical fee schedules on a regional basis for the reimbursement of health care providers providing services or equipment for medical expense benefits for which payment is to be made by an automobile insurer under personal injury protection coverage pursuant to P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-1 et seq.), by an insurer under medical expense benefits coverage pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.154 (C.17:28-1.6), or for payment of unreimbursed medical expenses that are admissible as uncompensated economic loss pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-12).  These fee schedules shall be promulgated on the basis of the type of service provided, and shall incorporate the reasonable and prevailing fees of 75% of the practitioners within the region.  If, in the case of a specialist provider, there are fewer than 50 specialists within a region, the fee schedule shall incorporate the reasonable and prevailing fees of the specialist providers on a Statewide basis.  The commissioner may contract with a proprietary purveyor of fee schedules for the maintenance of the fee schedule, which shall be adjusted biennially for inflation and for the addition of new medical procedures. In the case of services provided by an ambulatory surgical center (ASC) that are not currently listed on the Physicians' and ASC Fee Schedules, the Physicians' and ASC Fee Schedules shall provide for reimbursement to the ASC at a rate of 300 percent of the Medicare Part B payment rate for the service provided pursuant to section 1833 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1395l), for the same area, provided that the services are reimbursable pursuant to current Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services guidelines.  Unlisted medical supplies utilized in conjunction with services that are not currently listed on the Physicians' and ASC Fee Schedules shall be reimbursable at invoice cost plus 20 percent. b.    The fee schedule may provide for reimbursement for appropriate services on the basis of a diagnostic-related (DRG) payment by diagnostic code where appropriate, and may establish the use of a single fee, rather than an unbundled fee, for a group of services if those services are commonly provided together.  In the case of multiple procedures performed simultaneously, the fee schedule and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto may also provide for a standard fee for a primary procedure, and proportional reductions in the cost of the additional procedures. c.     No health care provider may demand or request any payment from any person in excess of those permitted by the medical fee schedules established pursuant to this section, nor shall any person be liable to any health care provider for any amount of money which results from the charging of fees in excess of those permitted by the medical fee schedules established pursuant to this section.  This subsection shall apply to unreimbursed medical expenses that are subject to the medical fee schedules and admissible as uncompensated economic loss pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-12). (cf: P.L.2019, c.245, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 120th day next following enactment.